Maryland, session 2026, HB0537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
1–105.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(I) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN §
5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE;
(II) A CONDOMINIUM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE;
OR
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS DEFINED IN § 11B–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “GOVERNING DOCUMENTS” MEANS ANY BYLAWS, COVENANTS,
DECLARATIONS, OR RULES OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(4) “LOT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11B–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) “RESIDENTIAL OWNER” MEANS:
(I) A MEMBER AS DEFINED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE
CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE;
(II) A UNIT OWNER AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE;
OR

HOUSE BILL 537 3
(III) A LOT OWNER.
(B) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ALL APPLICABLE LAWS GOVERNING
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES ESTABLISHED IN THE STATE, A RESIDENTIAL
OWNER IN A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY HAS THE FOLLOWING RIGHTS:
(1) THE RIGHT TO:
(I) BE DESIGNATED AS A MEMBER OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY WHEN THE COMMUNITY MAKES THAT RESIDENTIAL OWNER SUBJECT
TO A LIEN AND TO A MANDATORY ASSESSMENT; AND
(II) PARTICIPATE IN MEETINGS ON COMMUNITY ISSUES WITH
OTHER MEMBERS;
(2) THE RIGHT TO BE REPRESENTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY AND TO HAVE THE GOVERNING BODY
CONSIDER THE PRIORITIES OF ALL RESIDENTIAL OWNERS WHEN APPROVING A
BUDGET AND MANAGING THE COMMUNITY’S FACILITIES AND OPEN SPACE;
(3) THE RIGHT TO AN ANNUAL BUDGET FOR THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, TO BE DELIVERED TO THE RESIDENTIAL OWNER WITH THE
RESIDENTIAL OWNER’S ANNUAL NOTICE OF ASSESSMENT FEES OWED TO THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, THAT PRIORITIZES SUPPORT FOR THE
FACILITIES AND SERVICES AVAILABLE TO THE RESIDENTIAL OWNER IN THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(4) THE RIGHT TO USE ALL FACILITIES AND SERVICES OF THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY AT A REASONABLE COST THAT DOES NOT EXCEED
HALF THE COST CHARGED TO ELIGIBLE USERS WHO ARE NOT RESIDENTIAL OWNERS
IN THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(5) THE RIGHT TO BE A MEMBER OF THE CLASS OF SOLE OR PRIMARY
USERS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY’S FACILITIES AND SERVICES IF
THERE IS SCARCE AVAILABLE CAPACITY OF THESE FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND
TO BE PROVIDED WITH ADDITIONAL CAPACITY, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, SO THAT
THE CLASS IS NOT DENIED THE OPPORTUNITY TO USE THOSE FACILITIES AND
SERVICES;
(6) THE RIGHT TO FAIR TREATMENT IN THE REPAYMENT OF ANY
DEBT INCURRED BY THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY FOR MAJOR CAPITAL
PROJECTS OR OPERATING EXPENSES SO THAT PRESENT AND FUTURE RESIDENTIAL
OWNERS HAVE A RELATIVELY EQUAL SHARE IN THE RESPONSIBILITY TO REPAY

HOUSE BILL 537
SUCH DEBT;
(7) THE RIGHT TO VOTE:
(I) BY SECRET BALLOT TO ELECT THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE
GOVERNING BODY FOR THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY AND TO BE A
CANDIDATE IN FAIR ELECTIONS ADMINISTERED BY NEUTRAL PARTIES, WITH
RESULTS THAT CAN BE VERIFIED BY AN AUDIT ON REQUEST;
(II) TO RECALL AN INCUMBENT MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING
BODY;
(III) ON CERTAIN FINANCIAL MATTERS, IF PERMITTED IN THE
GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(IV) ON NEW CAPITAL PROJECTS PROPOSED BY THE GOVERNING
BODY, IF PERMITTED IN THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY AND BY REFERENDUM;
(8) THE RIGHT, WITH REGARD TO MEETINGS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE
GOVERNING BODY FOR THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OR A COMMITTEE OF
THE GOVERNING BODY, TO:
(I) RECEIVE REASONABLE ADVANCE NOTICE OF ANY OPEN AND
CLOSED MEETINGS, INCLUDING ANY AGENDA FOR A MEETING AND ANY SUPPORTING
INFORMATION;
(II) PARTICIPATE, EITHER IN PERSON OR THROUGH REMOTE
ACCESS, IN OPEN MEETINGS THAT ARE EASILY ACCESSIBLE TO THE RESIDENTIAL
OWNERS; AND
(III) A REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY TO SPEAK DURING A TIMELY
PERIOD WHEN MATTERS ARE DISCUSSED OR VOTED ON BY THE GOVERNING BODY
OR COMMITTEE;
(9) THE RIGHT TO HAVE A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
GOVERNING BODY AND COMMUNITY MANAGER THAT:
(I) ARE PROPERLY TRAINED AND INDEMNIFIED;
(II) ARE STEWARDS OF THE COMMUNITY’S COMMON
INTERESTS;

HOUSE BILL 537 5
(III) ARE PROTECTIVE OF THE RIGHTS OF RESIDENTIAL OWNERS
IN THE COMMUNITY;
(IV) PROVIDE RESIDENTIAL OWNERS DUE PROCESS AND EQUAL
PROTECTION; AND
(V) COMPLY AND FUNCTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATE LAW
AND THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS;
(10) THE RIGHT TO RECEIVE TIMELY ACCESS TO DOCUMENTS OF THE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO INSPECT AND COPY
SUCH DOCUMENTS;
(11) THE RIGHT TO RECEIVE PROMPT AND NONDISCRIMINATORY
SERVICE FROM THE STAFF AND GOVERNING BODY OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY;
(12) THE RIGHT TO INDIVIDUAL PRIVACY BY THE GOVERNANCE AND
MANAGEMENT OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(13) THE RIGHT TO FAIR TREATMENT IF CHARGED WITH A VIOLATION
OF THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS, INCLUDING THE OPPORTUNITY TO:
(I) BE NOTIFIED IN WRITING ABOUT THE NATURE OF THE
VIOLATION;
(II) PRESENT EVIDENCE AND CROSS–EXAMINE WITNESSES AT A
PROPER HEARING; AND
(III) ABATE THE VIOLATION WITHIN A REASONABLE AMOUNT OF
TIME;
(14) THE RIGHT TO:
(I) BE INFORMED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OF PROPOSED CHANGES TO EXISTING GOVERNING
DOCUMENTS OR POLICIES; AND
(II) VOTE TO APPROVE ANY CHANGES OF THE TYPE IDENTIFIED
IN ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM AND HAVE THOSE CHANGES PROPERLY ADOPTED AND
PUBLISHED; AND
(15) THE RIGHT TO HAVE THE CONSUMER PROTECTION DIVISION OF

HOUSE BILL 537
THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL:
(I) REVIEW ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF STATE LAWS THAT
GOVERN COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES; AND
(II) TAKE DIRECT ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS ON BEHALF OF A
RESIDENTIAL OWNER, INCLUDING BY ACTING TO RECEIVE AN ADJUDICATION OF
THE MATTER BEFORE A COURT OR THE IMPOSITION OF PENALTIES BY THE
MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(C) THE LISTING OF RIGHTS IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT
BE CONSTRUED TO DENY OR DETRACT FROM OTHER RIGHTS THAT MAY BE RETAINED
BY RESIDENTIAL OWNERS IN A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.